West Virginia, session 2026, SB882.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3g. blue envelope pROGRAM. §15-3G-1. Short title. This article shall be known and may be cited as "Blue Envelope Program." §15-3G-2. Findings and Declarations Relative to the "Blue Envelope Program". (a) By January 1, 2027, the West Virginia State Police, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall develop a "Blue Envelope Program" to promote inclusivity and enhanced communication between law enforcement and community members with a condition or disability where additional accommodations or awareness may be helpful. (b) The West Virginia State Police shall develop and implement a program for the promotion, printing, and distribution of envelopes for use by drivers diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder to provide to a law enforcement officer for the purpose of easing communication during a traffic stop or upon such law enforcement officer’s arrival at the scene of a traffic accident. §15-3G-3. Establishment of "Blue Envelope Program". (a) The "Blue Envelope Program" shall provide durable, blue-colored envelopes to persons with autism spectrum disorder.(b) The West Virginia State Police shall make "Blue Envelope Program" materials available by mail and at every West Virginia State Police detachment and county motor vehicle office.(c) Such blue envelopes shall:(1) Clearly state that the driver has been diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder and have printed directions for law enforcement officers on best practices for interacting with such driver with traffic stop safety tips;(2) Provide space for more information to be written about the driver’s communication needs and recommendations to the responding law enforcement officer with interaction techniques to help promote enhanced communication and accommodation between law enforcement and community members to effectively communicate, reduce stress and ensure everyone’s safety during interactions with law enforcement;(3) Have a blank area where the driver, or their emergency contact, may add additional noteworthy comments pertaining to the driver’s individual needs or requested accommodations and where the driver may write down the contact information of their emergency contact person;(4) Be of sufficient size to fit into the glove compartment of a motor vehicle and be able to hold a driver’s license, vehicle registration card, vehicle insurance card and other related documents; and,(5) Have printed directions instructing the driver to place his or her proof of vehicle registration and insurance in the envelope and provide such envelope and his or her driver’s license to law enforcement if he or she is ever involved in a traffic stop or traffic accident. §15-3G-4. Collection and Storage of Information. The West Virginia State Police shall not collect or store information identifying any person who has requested or received such an envelope, except any information necessary to distribute such an envelope to the requestor.  No such information shall be stored in any form after the distribution of such envelope is complete. §15-3G-5. Verification of Diagnosis. Nothing herein shall require the West Virginia State Police to verify any information provided on the envelope.  No action taken by any person, whether private citizen or public officer or employee, with regard to any information provided on the envelope shall create a warranty of the reliability or accuracy of the document, nor shall it create any liability on the part of the State of West Virginia or any department, office, or agency or of any officer, employee or agent thereof. §15-3G-6. Immunity from Civil or Criminal Liability. No person or entity who in good faith follows and abides by the provisions of this article is liable for any civil or criminal penalty as the result of any act or omission in the furtherance thereof unless it is alleged and proven that the information disclosed was false and disclosed with the knowledge that the information was false.